District of Columbia statutes.
8-109.01

Purpose.

The purpose of this subchapter is to promote the health, safety and welfare of District of Columbia (“District”) residents, to afford the fullest possible preservation and protection of the environment through a requirement that the environmental impact of proposed District government and privately initiated actions be examined before implementation and to require the Mayor, board, commission, or authority to substitute or require an applicant to substitute an alternative action or mitigating measures for a proposed action, if the alternative action or mitigating measures will accomplish the same purposes as the proposed action with minimized or no adverse environmental effects.

History

Oct. 18, 1989, D.C. Law 8-36, § 2, 36 DCR 5741

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-981.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 12 of the Solid Waste Facility Permit Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-144, October 23, 1995, 42 DCR 6044).

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 8-36, see Mayor’s Order 92-151, December 1, 1992.
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 8-116, the “Asbestos Licensing and Control Act of 1990”, see Mayor’s Order 98-51, April 15, 1998 ( 45 DCR 2697).
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 8-36, the “District of Columbia Environmental Policy Act of 1989”, see Mayor’s Order 98-86, May 29, 1998 ( 45 DCR 3980).